Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. Disposal of Garbage, Refuse and Dead Animals

§ 35-10-101.
Depositing or placing refuse matter, dead animals and garbage into rivers, ditches, railroad rights-of-way, highways or public grounds prohibited; exception.

The depositing, placing, or causing to be placed or put, the carcass of any dead animal or the offal or refuse matter from any slaughterhouse, butcher shop, meat market, packing house, fish house, hog pen, stable, or any spoiled meats, spoiled fish, or any animal or vegetable matter in a putrid or decayed condition or which is liable to become putrid, decayed or offensive, or the contents of a privy vault, or any refuse or garbage, or any offensive matter or substance whatever upon or into any river, creek, bay, pond, canal, ditch, lake, stream, railroad right-of-way, public or private roadway, highway, street, alley lot, field, meadow, public place or public ground, or in any other and different locality, building, or establishment in this state so located that the said substance shall directly or indirectly cause or threaten to cause the pollution or impairment of the purity and usefulness of the waters of any spring, reservoir, stream, irrigation ditch, lake or water supply whether surface or subterranean, which are used wholly or partly as a source of public or domestic water supply, or where the same may become a source of annoyance to any person, or within one-half mile of any inhabited dwelling, or within one-half mile of any public roadway, by any person or persons, association of persons, company or corporation, incorporated city, incorporated or unincorporated town in the state of Wyoming, or the knowingly permitting of such acts by the owner, tenant, or occupant of said places, upon, into, or on said places, or the permitting of said offensive substances or other offensive substances to remain thereon or therein, shall be unlawful and is hereby declared to constitute a nuisance detrimental to the public health and general welfare of the citizens of Wyoming, provided that no present or future operation of any existing municipal garbage disposal system or any extension of or changes therein, which involves substantially daily burning, and no present or future operation of any now existing municipal sewage disposal system or facilities or any extension of or changes therein, shall be considered as within the scope of the foregoing provisions of this act [§§

35-10-101

and

35-10-102

] or as a violation thereof but further provided that the foregoing exception concerning any existing municipal garbage disposal system, whether or not such involves substantially daily burning, shall not be applicable to or except from the scope of this act, any such system which has been commenced since prior construction in the close vicinity thereof, of occupied residential buildings or occupied business properties, ten [(10)] or more in number.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 131, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 9-705; W.S. 1957, § 35-462.

Cross references. —

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

The police power of the state extends to the prevention and abatement of nuisances.

Wartensleben v. Willey, 415 P.2d 613,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1966).

And a legislative body may prescribe what shall constitute a nuisance

within constitutional limits. Wartensleben v. Willey, 415 P.2d 613,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1966).

It is a proper function of the legislature to define those breaches of public policy which are to be considered public nuisances within the control of equity, and it is not the province of courts to ordain such jurisdiction for themselves in contravention of the legislative declaration. Hillmer v. McConnell Bros., 414 P.2d 972,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1966).

A cattle feeding operation is not a nuisance per se

and will not be enjoined unless the circumstances disclosing it constitute in fact a nuisance. Wartensleben v. Willey, 415 P.2d 613,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1966).

Nor a chicken or poultry business. —

A chicken or poultry business is not a nuisance per se but may become a nuisance per accidens. Wartensleben v. Willey, 415 P.2d 613,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1966).

Nor a meat processing plant or slaughterhouse. —

Neither a meat processing plant nor a slaughterhouse is a nuisance per se but may become a nuisance by reason of the character of the neighborhood in which it is situated. Wartensleben v. Willey, 415 P.2d 613,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1966).

Section applied to rabbit processing plant. —

See Hillmer v. McConnell Bros., 414 P.2d 972,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1966).

Criminal investigation on private premises not trespass. —

If an officer goes upon private premises in the performance of a duty and is investigating a criminal complaint, such as an alleged violation of this section, he is not a trespasser. Storms v. State, 590 P.2d 1321,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Regulation and licensing of private garbage or rubbish removal services, 83 ALR2d 799.

Liability of owner or occupant to garbage or trash man coming on premises in course of duty, 36 ALR3d 610.

Applicability of zoning regulations to waste disposal facilities of state or local governmental entities, 59 ALR3d 1244.

Sewage treatment plant as constituting nuisance, 92 ALR5th 517.

§ 35-10-102.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 35-10-101.

Any person violating the provisions of this act [§§

35-10-101

and

35-10-102

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or shall be punishable by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 131, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 9-706; W.S. 1957, § 35-463.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for contamination of streams or lakes by manufacturing or industrial works, see §

35-4-202

.

§ 35-10-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to littering, see §

6-3-204

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1884, ch. 62, § 4, related to throwing sawdust in streams.

§ 35-10-104.
Failure of owner to remove or bury dead animal.

It shall be the duty of the owner, or person having charge of an animal which may die in this state, to remove the carcass to a distance of not less than half a mile from the nearest human habitation, or to bury it with not less than two (2) feet of soil over it; and every person failing to so remove or bury such carcass, for more than forty-eight (48) hours, shall upon conviction, be fined in a sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00). And should such animal be the property or in charge of some person passing through this state, then any peace officer may (without warrant) detain the owner or person in charge of such animal, or of the flock or herd from which it died, as soon as such owner or person shall have shown an intention not to so bury or remove said carcass, by removing from it, or removing such flock or herd from it a distance of half a mile or more, a reasonable time, not to exceed two (2) days, until a warrant can issue upon an information duly sworn to. And the brand upon such animal may be given in proof of the ownership of the same.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 29, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1005; R.S. 1899, § 5111; C.S. 1910, § 5962; C.S. 1920, § 7251; R.S. 1931, § 32-706; C.S. 1945, § 9-704; W.S. 1957, § 35-465.

Editor's notes. —

The last sentence of this section was omitted from the 1899 Revised Statutes and from all subsequent compilations down to and including that of 1931. It was reinstated by the 1945 compiler.

§§ 35-10-105 through 35-10-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 90, §§ 1 to 3, related to placing of garbage, debris, etc. For present similar provisions, see §

6-3-204

.